Hawaii statutes.
[§11-339] Final election period
report for candidate committee or noncandidate committee receiving and
expending $1,000 or less during the election period. (a) Any provision of
law to the contrary notwithstanding, a candidate committee or noncandidate committee
whose aggregate contributions and aggregate expenditures for the election
period total $1,000 or less, shall electronically file only a final election
period report, and need not file a preliminary and final primary report, a
preliminary and final general report, or a special election report.

(b) Until the candidate committee's or
noncandidate committee's registration is terminated as provided in section 11-326,
supplemental reports and other reports required by this part shall be filed. [L
2010, c 211, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next